Maryland, session 2025, HB0253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
2–501.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0253*

HOUSE BILL 253
(2) “Baltimore City centralized booking facility” means the centralized
booking facility in Baltimore City that is operated by the Division of Pretrial Detention and
Services in the Department.
(3) “Election–related materials” means documents and other items
associated with the registering for and voting in an election, including:
(i) [absentee ballot applications;
(ii)] absentee ballots; and
[(iii)] (II) voter registration applications.
(4) “Eligible voter” means an individual who:
(i) is incarcerated at the Baltimore City centralized booking facility;
and
(ii) has the right to vote under State law.
(b) The Baltimore City centralized booking facility shall:
(1) provide a secure, designated ballot drop box from the State Board of
Elections to eligible voters so that they may easily submit the following election–related
materials to the State Board of Elections or a local board of elections:
(i) [absentee ballot applications;
(ii)] absentee ballots; and
[(iii)] (II) voter registration forms;
(2) monitor the ballot drop box provided under item (1) of this subsection
24 hours a day and 7 days a week; and
(3) disseminate written notifications directly to each eligible voter on how
and when to use the ballot drop box provided under item (1) of this subsection.
(c) (1) The State Board of Elections shall provide the Baltimore City
centralized booking facility with:
(i) the ballot drop box and written notification materials to
disseminate to eligible voters under subsection (b) of this section; and
(ii) advice and guidance in carrying out the requirements of
subsection (b) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 253 3
(2) The State shall pay for the ballot drop box.
(d) The Baltimore City centralized booking facility shall cooperate fully with the
State Board of Elections in implementing the requirements of this section.
Article – Election Law
1–303.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Baltimore City centralized booking facility” means the centralized
booking facility in Baltimore City that is operated by the Division of Pretrial Detention and
Services in the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(3) “Election–related materials” means documents and other items
associated with the registering for and voting in an election, including:
(i) [absentee ballot applications;
(ii)] absentee ballots; and
[(iii)] (II) voter registration applications.
(4) “Eligible voter” means an individual who:
(i) is incarcerated at the Baltimore City centralized booking facility;
and
(ii) has the right to vote under State law.
(b) The State Board shall adopt regulations in collaboration with the Department
of Public Safety and Correctional Services to provide the following at the Baltimore City
centralized booking facility in accordance with § 2–501 of the Correctional Services Article:
(1) a secure, designated ballot drop box for election–related materials; and
(2) written notifications on how and when eligible voters may use the ballot
drop box.
(c) (1) The State Board shall provide the ballot drop box under subsection (b)
of this section to the Baltimore City centralized booking facility in time to allow eligible
voters sufficient opportunity to submit election–related materials before any
election–related deadlines.

HOUSE BILL 253
(2) The local board of elections for Baltimore City shall provide staff to
collect:
(i) election–related materials submitted to the ballot drop box on at
least a weekly basis; and
(ii) the ballot drop box after an election–related deadline.
(3) The local board of elections for Baltimore City shall distribute the
election–related materials collected from the ballot drop box to the State Board or a local
board, as appropriate and in a timely manner.
(d) On or before January 1 each year, the local board of elections for Baltimore
City shall submit a report to the Senate Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs
Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House Committee on Ways
and Means, and the House Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, on the following information submitted to the ballot drop box,
disaggregated by each weekly collection from the ballot drop box and by the State Board or
the local board that is the intended recipient of the election–related materials:
(1) [the number of absentee ballot applications received and accepted;
(2)] absentee ballots received and accepted; and
[(3)] (2) other election–related materials received.
1–303.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Correctional facility” means a facility for detaining or confining
individuals that is operated by a correctional unit.
(3) “Correctional unit” has the meaning stated in § 2–401(b) of the
Correctional Services Article.
(4) “Eligible voter” means an individual who:
(i) is incarcerated in a correctional facility; and
(ii) has the right to vote under State law.
(b) The State Board shall adopt regulations establishing a program to inform
eligible voters of upcoming elections and how eligible voters may exercise the right to vote.
(c) The regulations adopted under subsection (b) of this section shall require the
State Board or local boards to:

HOUSE BILL 253 5
(1) disseminate information on eligibility requirements to register to vote
and voter registration applications to eligible voters at least 30 days before the deadline to
register to vote before each election;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, disseminate
instructions on absentee voting, absentee ballot applications, and absentee ballots before
each election in a timely manner;
(3) provide frequent opportunities for eligible voters to register to vote and
to vote; and
(4) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, provide for the
timely return of voter registration applications, absentee ballot applications, and absentee
ballots completed by eligible voters.
(d) THE STATE BOARD OR THE LOCAL BOARDS SHALL AUTOMATICALLY
SEND AN ABSENTEE BALLOT TO EACH REGISTERED VOTER IN PRETRIAL DETENTION
AT A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY:
(1) WITHOUT THE VOTER HAVING TO SUBMIT AN ABSENTEE BALLOT
APPLICATION; AND
(2) IN SUFFICIENT TIME BEFORE ELECTION DAY FOR THE VOTER TO
SUBMIT THE ABSENTEE BALLOT IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(E) Each correctional facility shall cooperate fully with the State Board and the
local boards in implementing the program required under this section.
[(e)] (F) On or before January 15 each year, the State Board shall submit a
report to the Senate Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs Committee and the
House Ways and Means Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, that includes the following information, disaggregated by correctional facility:
(1) the number of eligible voters who registered to vote, attempted to vote,
and voted successfully by absentee ballot during the immediately preceding calendar year;
(2) the number of times the State Board or a local board of elections visited
each correctional facility during the immediately preceding calendar year, the duration of
each visit, and a description of the work done at each correctional facility;
(3) a description of any obstacles to implementing this section or § 2–501
of the Correctional Services Article; and
(4) any recommendations for improving the implementation of this section
or § 2–501 of the Correctional Services Article.

HOUSE BILL 253
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.